Utah statutes.
63M-1-2606.   Review of initial proposal -- Affected department review.
(1)  The committee shall review and evaluate an initial proposal submitted in
accordance with:
(a)  this part; and
(b)  any rule established by the board under Section 63M-1-2603.
(2)  If the committee, in its sole discretion, determines to proceed with the
project, the committee shall submit a copy of the initial proposal to:
(a)   the affected department; and
(b)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(3) (a)  An affected department, directly affected state entity, and school
district receiving a copy of the initial proposal under Subsection (2) or (4)
shall review the initial proposal and provide the committee with any comment,
suggestion, or modification to the project.
(b)  After receiving an initial proposal, the Governor's Office of Planning
and Budget shall prepare an economic feasibility report containing:
(i)  information concerning the economic feasibility and effectiveness of the
project based upon competent evidence;
(ii)  a dollar amount representing the total estimated fiscal impact of the
project to the affected department and the state; and
(iii)  any other matter the committee requests or is required by the board by
rule.
(4)  In reviewing an initial proposal, the affected department shall share the
initial proposal with any other state entity or school district that will be
directly affected if the proposal is ultimately adopted, if the
confidentiality of the initial proposal is maintained.
(5)  If the committee determines to proceed with the project, the committee
shall submit a copy of the initial proposal, including any comment,
suggestion, or modification to the initial proposal, to:
(a)  the chief procurement officer in accordance with Section 63G-6-408.5; and
(b)  the Executive Appropriations Committee, for informational purposes.
(6)  Before taking any action under Subsection (5), the committee shall
consider:
(a)  any comment, suggestion, or modification to the initial proposal
submitted in accordance with Subsection (3);
(b)  the extent to which the project is practical, efficient, and economically
beneficial to the state and the affected department;
(c)  the economic feasibility report prepared by the Governor's Office of
Planning and Budget; and
(d)  any other reasonable factor identified by the committee or required by
the board by rule.
